District of Columbia statutes.
9-325

Francis Case Memorial Bridge.

The bridge crossing the Washington Channel of the Potomac River on Interstate Route 395, approximately 100 yards downstream from the outlet gate of the Tidal Basin, near the intersection of the extension of 13th and G Streets Southwest, shall be known and designated as the “Francis Case Memorial Bridge.” Any law, regulation, map, document, record, or other paper of the United States or of the District of Columbia in which such bridge is referred to shall be held to refer to such bridge as the “Francis Case Memorial Bridge.”

Sept. 25, 1965, 79 Stat. 838, Pub. L. 89-203, § 1

History

1981 Ed., § 7-525.
1973 Ed., § 7-525.

Prior Codifications

Interstate Route 395 was substituted for Interstate Route 95 in the first sentence of this section to update terminology.

References in Text